Washington statutes.
RCW 15.24.080

Research, advertising, and educational campaign—Beneficial purposes.

In order to benefit the people of this state, the state's economy and its general tax revenues, the commission shall provide for and conduct a comprehensive and extensive research, advertising, and educational campaign as continuous as the crop, sales, and market conditions reasonably require. It shall investigate and ascertain the needs of growers, conditions of the markets, and extent to which public convenience and necessity require research and advertising to be conducted.

[ 2016 sp.s. c 15 s 6; 2002 c 313 s 120; 1961 c 11 s 15.24.080. Prior: 1937 c 195 s 13, part; RRS s 2874-13, part.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.